District of Columbia statutes.
22-4234

Duties.

(a)

The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall:

(1)

Make recommendations concerning the coordination of the activities and the mobilization of the resources of the member agencies in improving public safety in, and the criminal justice system of, the District of Columbia;

(2)

Cooperate with and support the member agencies in carrying out the purposes of the CJCC;

(3)

Define and analyze issues and procedures in the criminal justice system, identify alternative solutions, and make recommendations for improvements and changes in the programs of the criminal justice system;

(4)

Receive information from, and give assistance to, other District of Columbia agencies concerned with, or affected by, issues of public safety and the criminal justice system;

(5)

Make recommendations regarding systematic operational and infrastructural matters as are believed necessary to improve public safety in District of Columbia and federal criminal justice agencies;

(6)

Advise and work collaboratively with the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice, Justice Grants Administration in developing justice planning documents and allocating grant funds;

(7)

Select ex-officio members to participate in Criminal Justice Coordinating Council planning sessions and subcommittees as necessary to meet the organization’s goals;

(8)

Establish measurable goals and objectives for reform initiatives; and

(b)

The CJCC shall also report, on an annual basis, on the status and progress of the goals and objectives referenced in subsection (a)(8) of this section, including any recommendations made by the CJCC and its subcommittees to the membership of the CJCC, the public, the Mayor, and the Council. The report shall be submitted to the Mayor and the Council within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year and shall be the subject of a public hearing before the Council during the annual budget process. The CJCC’s budget and future funding requests shall also be the subject of a hearing before the Council during the annual budget process.

(c)

The CJCC is designated as a criminal justice agency for purposes of transmitting electronically to local, state, and federal agencies criminal-justice-related information, as required by CJCC to perform the duties specified under this section and in accordance with the terms and conditions regarding data sharing approved by the agency that is the source of the information for transmission.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1505, 48 DCR 6981
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 3072, 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added (c).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1405 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3072 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3072 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 3071 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle H of Title III of the act may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Coordinating Council Criminal Justice Designation Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.